Illinois, session 104th, HB5632.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department 8of Children and Family Services:9ENTIRE AGENCY10PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND11  For Personal Services...........................423,848,60012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security.................................32,424,50014  For Contractual Services.........................44,521,50015  For Travel..........................................727,60016  For Commodities.....................................752,50017  For Printing........................................562,40018  For Equipment.....................................4,823,90019  For Electronic Data Processing...................57,299,70020  For Telecommunication Services....................7,475,40021  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............1,009,50022    Total                                        $573,445,600   HB5632- 2 -OMB104 00174 LDO 10174 b1PAYABLE FROM THE DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND2  For Travel........................................7,038,800 3    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 5purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department 6of Children and Family Services:7CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION8PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND9  For Attorney General Representation10   on Child Welfare Litigation Issues.................862,00011PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND12  For Information Technology.......................88,506,40013PAYABLE FROM DCFS SPECIAL PURPOSES TRUST FUND14  For Expenditures of Private Funds15   for Child Welfare Improvements...................2,794,500 16    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department 19of Children and Family Services:20REGULATION AND QUALITY CONTROL21PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND22  For Child Death Review Teams........................108,600 23    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much   HB5632- 3 -OMB104 00174 LDO 10174 b1thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 2the Department of Children and Family Services:3CHILD WELFARE4PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND5  For Targeted Case Management.....................12,661,1006PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND7  For Independent Living Initiative................11,838,8008PAYABLE FROM DCFS FEDERAL PROJECTS FUND9  For Federal Child Welfare Projects..................816,600 10    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 12the Department of Children and Family Services:13CHILD PROTECTION14PAYABLE FROM DCFS FEDERAL PROJECTS FUND15  For Federal Grant Awards.........................15,000,000 16    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 18the Department of Children and Family Services:19BUDGET, LEGAL AND COMPLIANCE20PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND21  For Refunds..........................................11,20022PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND23  For Title IV-E Enhancement........................4,228,80024  For SSI Reimbursement.............................1,513,300  HB5632- 4 -OMB104 00174 LDO 10174 b1    Total                                          $5,742,100 2    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 4the Department of Children and Family Services for payments 5for care of children served by the Department of Children and 6Family Services:7GRANTS-IN-AID8REGIONAL OFFICES9PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND10  For Youth in Transition Program...................2,708,60011  For Counseling and Auxiliary Services............19,209,90012  For Court Appointed Special Advocates.............4,310,00013  For Cash Assistance and Housing14   Locator Service to Families in the15   Class Defined in the Norman Consent Order........3,322,30016  For Assisting in the Development17   of Children's Advocacy Centers...................2,216,90018  For Family Preservation Services.................42,520,90019  For Foster Homes and Specialized20   Foster Care and Prevention,21   including prior years' costs...................395,104,00022  For Purchase of Adoption and23   Guardianship Services, including 24   prior years' costs.............................198,821,60025  For Institution and Group Home Care and  HB5632- 5 -OMB104 00174 LDO 10174 b1   Prevention, including prior years' costs.......288,016,2002  For Services Associated with the Foster3   Care Initiative..................................6,268,0004  For grants and administrative expenses of the5   Comprehensive Community-Based Youth Services....35,000,0006    Total                                        $997,498,4007PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND8  For Counseling and Auxiliary Services............19,362,6009  For Children's Personal and10   Physical Maintenance.............................5,471,80011  For Court Appointed Special Advocates.............5,457,00012  For Cash Assistance and Housing Locator13   Services to Families in the14   Class Defined in the Norman15   Consent Order....................................6,074,70016  For Assisting in the development17   of Children's Advocacy Centers...................5,401,50018  For Psychological Assessments19   Including Operations and20   Administrative Expenses..........................3,466,30021  For Family Preservation Services.................44,166,40022  For Family Centered Services Initiative..........17,716,90023  For Foster Homes and Specialized24   Foster Care and Prevention,25   including prior years' costs...................290,437,00026  For Purchase of Adoption and   HB5632- 6 -OMB104 00174 LDO 10174 b1   Guardianship Services, including2   prior years' costs..............................61,233,2003  For Institution and Group Home Care and4   Prevention, including prior years' costs........93,831,3005  For Services Associated with the Foster6   Care Initiative..................................1,707,2007    Total                                        $554,325,900 8    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 10the Department of Children and Family Services for:11GRANTS-IN-AID12CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION13PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND14  For Department Scholarship Program...............20,698,000 15    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 17the Department of Children and Family Services for:18GRANTS-IN-AID19CHILD PROTECTION20PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND21  For Protective/Family Maintenance22   Day Care........................................62,246,50023  For Residential Construction Services Grants, or24   for deposit into the DCFS Special Purposes  HB5632- 7 -OMB104 00174 LDO 10174 b1   Trust Fund.........................................900,000 2    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 4the Department of Children and Family Services for:5GRANTS-IN-AID6BUDGET, LEGAL AND COMPLIANCE7PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND8  For Tort Claims......................................66,0009PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND10  For all expenditures related to the11   collection and distribution of Title IV-E12   Reimbursement....................................3,000,00013  For expenses related to litigation................4,232,200 14    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 15thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 16the Department of Children and Family Services for:17GRANTS-IN-AID18CLINICAL SERVICES19PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND20   For Foster Care and Adoptive Care Training......19,028,900 21    Section 55. The sum of $100,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 23business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore   HB5632- 8 -OMB104 00174 LDO 10174 b1made for such purpose in Article 44, Section 55 of Public Act 2104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Build 3Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Children and Family 4Services for grants and administrative expenses associated 5with Level of Care Support Services, including prior years' 6costs. 7    Section 60. No contract shall be entered into or 8obligation incurred for any expenditures from the 9reappropriation made in Section 55 until after the purposes 10and amounts have been approved in writing by the Governor. 11    Section 65. The sum of $30,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the DCFS Special 13Purposes Trust Fund to the Department of Children and Family 14Services for grants and administrative expenses associated 15with the Level of Care Support Services, including prior 16years' costs. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182026.